Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 43.20.280.
Taxpayers’ remedies. [Repealed, § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976.
For current law, see AS 43.05.240.]

Sec. 43.20.290.
Exclusive state authority.

No tax may be levied and collected upon the net income of resident or nonresident individuals by a general law city or by a home rule city or any other political subdivision of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1961)

Sec. 43.20.300.
References to Internal Revenue Code.

The provisions of the Internal Revenue Code as now in effect or hereafter amended mentioned in this chapter are incorporated in this chapter by reference and have effect as though fully set out in this chapter.

When portions of the Internal Revenue Code incorporated by reference as provided in (a) of this section refer to rules and regulations adopted by the United States Commissioner of Internal Revenue, or hereafter adopted, they are regarded as regulations adopted by the department under and in accord with the provisions of this chapter, unless and until the department adopts specific regulations in place of them conformable with this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 B ch 115 SLA 1949)

Secs. 43.20.310,
43.20.320.
Taxable years to which applicable; arrangement and classification. [Repealed, § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 43.20.330.
Penalties. [Repealed, § 3 ch 169 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 43.20.335.
Penalties. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.
For current law, see AS 43.05.220 and 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.20.340.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“bank” means a financial institution including a national banking association;

“corporation” includes an association, joint-stock company, and an insurance company;

“fiscal year” means an accounting period of 12 months ending on the last day of a month other than December;

“includes” and “including” when used in a definition do not exclude other things otherwise within the meaning of the word defined;

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of the United States (26 U.S.C.) as the code exists now or as hereafter amended, as the code and amendments apply to the normal taxes and surtax on net incomes, which amendments are operative for the purposes of this chapter as of the time they became operative or will become operative under federal law;

“part-year resident” means an individual who enters or leaves the state during the taxable year and who has resided or was domiciled in the state for a period of less than 12 months during the taxable year;

“person” means an individual, a trust or estate, or partnership, or a corporation;

“taxable year” means the calendar year or the fiscal year ending during the calendar year upon the basis of which the net income is computed under this chapter; “taxable year” includes, in the case of a return made for a fractional part of a year under this chapter, the period for which the return is made;

“taxpayer” means a person subject to a tax imposed by this chapter;

“trade or business” includes the engaging in or carrying on of a trade, business, profession, vocation, employment, and rendition of services or commercial activity and includes the performance of the function of a public office.

History.

(§ 3 A ch 115 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1953; am § 12 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 6 ch 68 SLA 1987; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs were reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 2012 to conform to the repeal of former paragraph (3).

Sec. 43.20.350.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Net Income Tax Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1949)